District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.09

Rights of certain boards preserved.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the Board of Education, the Board of Library Trustees, or the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia from naming or renaming the public buildings or spaces under their respective jurisdictions.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 409, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-459.